Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 4A Department of Juvenile Justice
49-4A-8.
Commitment of delinquent children; procedure; cost; return of mentally ill or developmentally disabled children; escapees; discharge; evidence of commitment; records; restitution.

When the court does not release a delinquent child unconditionally or place him or her on probation or in a suitable public or private institution or agency, the court may commit such child to the department as provided in Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15; provided, however, that no delinquent child shall be committed to the department until the department certifies to the Governor that it has facilities available and personnel ready to assume responsibility for delinquent children.

When the court commits a delinquent child to the department, it may order such child conveyed forthwith to any facility designated by the department or direct that such child be left at liberty until otherwise ordered by the department under such conditions as will ensure his or her availability and submission to any orders of the department. If such delinquent child is ordered conveyed to the department, the court shall assign an officer or other suitable person to convey such child to any facility designated by the department, provided that the person assigned to convey a girl must be female. The cost of conveying such child committed to the department to the facility designated by the department shall be paid by the county from which such child is committed, provided that no compensation shall be allowed beyond the actual and necessary expenses of the party conveying and the child conveyed.

When a court commits a delinquent child to the department, the court shall at once electronically submit a certified copy of the order of commitment to the department, and the court, the juvenile probation officer, the community supervision officer, the prosecuting and police authorities, the school authorities, and other public officials shall make available to the department all pertinent information in their possession pertaining to the case, including, but not limited to, any predisposition investigation report as set forth in Code Section 15-11-590 and any risk assessment. Such reports shall, if the department so requests, be made upon forms furnished by the department or according to an outline provided by the department.

When a delinquent child has been committed to the department, the department shall, under rules and regulations established by the board, forthwith examine and study such child and investigate all pertinent circumstances of his or her life and behavior. The department shall make periodic reexaminations of all such children within its control, except those on release under supervision of the department. Such reexaminations may be made as frequently as the department considers desirable, and every such child shall be reexamined at intervals not exceeding one year. Failure of the department to examine such a child committed to it or to reexamine him or her within one year of a previous examination shall not of itself entitle such child to discharge from control of the department but shall entitle such child to petition the committing court for an order of discharge; and the court shall discharge him or her unless the department, upon due notice, satisfies the court of the necessity of further control.

The department shall keep written records of all examinations and reexaminations, of conclusions based thereon, and of all orders concerning the disposition or treatment of every delinquent child subject to its control. Records maintained by the department pertaining to a delinquent child committed to the department shall not be public records but shall be privileged records and may be disclosed by direction of the commissioner pursuant to federal law regarding disseminating juvenile criminal history records only to those persons having a legitimate interest therein; provided, however, that the commissioner shall permit the Council of Juvenile Court Judges to inspect and copy such records for the purposes of obtaining statistics on juveniles.

Except as provided by subsection (e.1) of this Code section and subsection (c) or (d) of Code Section 15-11-602, when a delinquent child has been committed to the department for detention and a diagnostic study for the purpose of determining the most satisfactory plan for such child’s care and treatment has been completed, the department may:

Permit such child liberty under supervision and upon such conditions as the department may believe conducive to acceptable behavior;

Order such child’s confinement under such conditions as the department may believe best designed to serve such child’s welfare and as may be in the best interest of the public;

Order reconfinement or renewed release as often as conditions indicate to be desirable;

Revoke or modify any order of the department affecting such child, except an order of final discharge, as often as conditions indicate to be desirable; or

Discharge such child from control of the department pursuant to Code Section 15-11-32 and subsection (c) of Code Section 15-11-607 when it is satisfied that such discharge will best serve such child’s welfare and the protection of the public.

(e.1) (1)

When a child who has been adjudicated for the commission of a class A designated felony act or class B designated felony act as defined in Code Section 15-11-2 is released from confinement or custody of the department, it shall be the responsibility of the department to provide notice to any person who was the victim of such child’s acts that such child is being released from confinement or custody.

As a means of correcting the socially harmful tendencies of a delinquent child committed to it, the department may:

Require participation by such child in moral, academic, vocational, physical, and correctional training and activities, and provide such child the opportunity for religious activities where practicable in the institutions under the control and supervision of the department;

Require such modes of life and conduct as may seem best adapted to fit and equip him or her for return to full liberty without danger to the public;

Provide such medical, psychiatric, or casework treatment as is necessary; or

Place him or her, if physically fit, in a park, maintenance camp, or forestry camp or on a ranch owned by the state or by the United States and require any child so housed to perform suitable conservation and maintenance work, provided that the children shall not be exploited and that the dominant purpose of such activities shall be to benefit and rehabilitate the children rather than to make the camps self-sustaining.

When funds are available, the department may:

Establish and operate places for detention and diagnosis of all delinquent children committed to it;

Establish and operate additional treatment and training facilities, including parks, forestry camps, maintenance camps, ranches, and group residences necessary to classify and handle juvenile delinquents of different ages and habits and different mental and physical conditions, according to their needs; and

Establish aftercare supervision to aid children given conditional release to find homes and employment and otherwise to assist them to become reestablished in the community and to lead socially acceptable lives.

Whenever the department finds that any child committed to the department is mentally ill or has a developmental disability, as defined in Code Section 15-11-2, the department shall have the power to return such child to the court of original jurisdiction for appropriate disposition by that court or may, if it so desires, request the court having jurisdiction in the county in which the juvenile detention facility is located to take such action as the condition of the child may require.

A child who has been committed to the department for detention in a juvenile detention facility or who has been otherwise taken into custody and who has escaped therefrom or who has been placed under supervision and broken the conditions thereof may be taken into custody without a warrant by a sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, police officer, probation officer, or any other officer of this state authorized to serve criminal process upon a written request made by an employee of the department having knowledge of the escape or of the violation of conditions of supervision. Before a child may be taken into custody for violation of the conditions of supervision, such written request shall be reviewed by the commissioner or his or her designee. If the commissioner or his or her designee finds that probable cause exists to believe that such child has violated his or her conditions of supervision, he or she may issue an order directing that such child be picked up and returned to custody.

The commissioner may designate as a peace officer who is authorized to exercise the power of arrest any employee of the department whose full-time duties include the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, the detection of crime, or the supervision of delinquent children or children in need of services in its institutions, facilities, or programs, the supervision of delinquent children or children in need of services under intensive supervision in the community, or any employee who is a line supervisor of any such employee. The commissioner also may designate as a peace officer who is authorized to exercise the power of arrest any employee of a person or organization which contracts with the department pertaining to the management, custody, care, and control of delinquent children or children in need of services retained by the person or organization if that employee’s full-time duties include the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, the detection of crime, or the supervision of delinquent children in the department’s institutions, facilities, or programs, or any employee who is a line supervisor of such employee. The commissioner may designate one or more employees of the department to investigate and apprehend children who have escaped from a juvenile detention facility or who have broken the conditions of supervision; provided, however, that the employees so designated shall only be those with primary responsibility for the security functions of such facilities or whose primary duty consists of the apprehension of youths who have escaped from such facilities or who have broken the conditions of supervision. An employee of the department so designated shall have the police power to investigate, to apprehend such children, and to arrest any person physically interfering with the proper apprehension of such children. An employee of the department so designated in the investigative section of the department shall have the power to obtain a search warrant for the purpose of locating and apprehending such children. Additionally, such employee, while on the grounds or in the buildings of the department’s institutions or facilities, shall have the same law enforcement powers, including the power of arrest, as a law enforcement officer of the local government with police jurisdiction over such institutions or facilities. Such employee shall be authorized to carry weapons, upon written approval of the commissioner, notwithstanding Code Sections 16-11-126 and 16-11-129. The commissioner shall also be authorized to designate any person or organization with whom the department contracts for services pertaining to the management, custody, care, and control of delinquent children or children in need of services detained by the person or organization as a law enforcement unit under paragraph (7) of Code Section 35-8-2. Any employee or person designated under this subsection shall be considered to be a peace officer within the meaning of Chapter 8 of Title 35 and shall be certified under that chapter.

For the purposes of investigation of children who have escaped from juvenile detention facilities of the department or of children who are alleged to have broken the conditions of supervision, the department is empowered and authorized to request and receive from the Georgia Crime Information Center any information in the files of the Georgia Crime Information Center which will aid in the apprehension of such children.

An employee designated pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection may take a child into custody without a warrant upon personal knowledge or written request of a person having knowledge of the escape or violation of conditions of supervision, or a child may be taken into custody pursuant to Code Section 15-11-501. When taking a child into custody pursuant to this paragraph, a designated employee of the department shall have the power to use all force reasonably necessary to take such child into custody.

The child shall be kept in custody in a suitable place designated by the department and there detained until such child may be returned to the custody of the department.

Such taking into custody shall not be termed an arrest; provided, however, that any person taking a child into custody pursuant to this subsection shall have the same immunity from civil and criminal liability as a peace officer making an arrest pursuant to a valid warrant.

The department shall ensure that each child it releases under supervision or otherwise has suitable clothing, transportation to his or her home or to the county in which a suitable home or employment has been found for him or her, and such an amount of money as the rules and regulations of the board may authorize. The expenditure for clothing and for transportation and the payment of money to such child released may be made from funds for support and maintenance appropriated by the General Assembly to the department or to the institution from which such child is released or from local funds.

Every child committed to the department, if not already discharged, shall be discharged from custody of the department when he or she reaches his or her twenty-first birthday.

Commitment of a child to the custody of the department shall not operate to disqualify such child in any future examination, appointment, or application for public service under the government either of the state or of any political subdivision thereof.

A commitment to the department shall not be received in evidence or used in any way in any proceedings in any court, except in subsequent proceedings for delinquency or being in need of services involving the same child and except in imposing sentence in any criminal proceeding against the same person.

The department shall conduct a continuing inquiry into the effectiveness of treatment methods it employs in seeking the rehabilitation of maladjusted children. To this end, the department shall maintain a statistical record of arrests and commitments of its wards subsequent to their discharge from the jurisdiction and control of the department and shall tabulate, analyze, and publish in print or electronically annually these data so that they may be used to evaluate the relative merits of methods of treatment. The department shall cooperate and coordinate with courts, juvenile court clerks, the Governor’s Office for Children and Families, the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council, and public and private agencies in the collection of statistics and information regarding:

Juvenile delinquency;

Arrests made;

Detentions made, the offense for which such detention was authorized, and the reason for each detention;

Complaints filed;

Informations filed;

Petitions filed;

The results of complaints, informations, and petitions, including whether such filings were dismissed, diverted, or adjudicated;

Commitments to the department, the length of such commitment, and releases from the department;

The department’s placement decisions for commitments;

Placement decisions to institutions, camps, or other facilities for delinquent children operated under the direction of courts or other local public authorities;

Community programs utilized and completion data for such programs;

Recidivism;

Data collected by juvenile court clerks pursuant to Code Section 15-11-64; and

Other information useful in determining the amount and causes of juvenile delinquency in this state.

In order to facilitate the collection of the information required by paragraph (1) of this subsection, the department shall be authorized to inspect and copy all records of the court and law enforcement agencies pertaining to juveniles and collect data from juvenile court clerks.

When a child committed to the department is under court order to make certain restitution as a part of his or her treatment by the court, the requirement that the restitution be paid in full shall not cease with the order of commitment. The provision of the order requiring restitution shall remain in force and effect during the period of commitment, and the department is empowered to enforce such restitution requirement and to direct that payment of funds or notification of service completed be made to the clerk of the juvenile court or another employee of that court designated by the judge.

(2)

The department and employees of the department shall not be liable for damages incurred by reason of the department’s failure to provide the notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(3)

When a child convicted of a felony offense in a superior court is released from confinement or custody of the department, the department shall provide written notice, including the delinquent act or class A designated felony act or class B designated felony act committed, to the superintendent of the school system in which such child was enrolled or, if the information is known, the school in which such child was enrolled or plans to be enrolled.

(4)

The department and employees of the department shall not be liable for damages incurred by reason of the department’s failure to provide notice required by paragraph (3) of this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1993, p. 313, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 619, § 8; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1016, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 582, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 20, § 26; Ga. L. 2006, p. 293, § 4/HB 1145; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 2-20/SB 308; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-8/HB 242; Ga. L. 2014, p. 382, § 4/SB 324; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-101/HB 310; Ga. L. 2015, p. 890, § 7/HB 263.

The 2013 amendments.

The first 2013 amendment, effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in this Code section. See Editor’s notes for extent of application. The second 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “the supervision of delinquent children or children in need of services under intensive supervision in the community,” near the end of the first sentence of paragraph (i)(2).

The 2015 amendments.

The first 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “the juvenile probation officer, the community supervision officer, the prosecuting and police authorities” for “the probation officer, the prosecuting and police authorities” in subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability. The second 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, inserted “, the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council,” near the end of the introductory language of paragraph (n)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 293, Part II, § 2/HB 1145, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the changes made by Part II of that Act shall be known and may be cited as “Amy’s Law”. Part II of Ga. L. 2006, p. 293 amended Code Sections 15-11-70 and 49-4A-8.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 3-1/SB 308, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to all offenses committed on and after June 4, 2010 and shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before June 4, 2010 and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecution.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 54(f)/HB79, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2013 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendments to subsection (e.1) and paragraph (i)(1) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB79 will not be given effect in this Code section effective January 1, 2014.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment by this Act shall apply to sentences entered on or after July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section and O.C.G.A. §

49-4A-9

, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 80 (1995).

For article, “Crimes and Offenses,” see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 131 (2011).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

49-4A-9.
Sentence of youthful offenders; modification of order; review; participation in programs.

Any child who has previously been adjudged to have committed an act which is a felony if tried in a superior court and who, on a second or subsequent occasion, is convicted of a felony in a superior court may, in the discretion of the court, be sentenced into the custody of the department as otherwise provided by law or be committed as a youthful offender as authorized in Chapter 7 of Title 42; provided, further, that any child convicted of a felony punishable by death or by confinement for life shall only be sentenced into the custody of the Department of Corrections.

Any final order of judgment by the court in the case of any such child shall be subject to such modification from time to time as the court may consider to be for the welfare of such child. No commitment of any child to any institution or other custodial agency shall deprive the court of jurisdiction to change the form of the commitment or transfer the custody of the child to some other institution or agency on such conditions as the court may see fit to impose, the duty being constant upon the court to give to all children subject to its jurisdiction such oversight and control in the premises as will be conducive to the welfare of the child and the best interests of the state; provided, however, that the release of any child committed to the department for detention in any of its institutions under the terms of this chapter during the period of one year from the date of commitment shall be had only with the concurrence and recommendation of the commissioner or the commissioner’s designated representative; provided, further, that upon releasing any child adjudicated for committing a delinquent act for the commission of a class A designated felony act or class B designated felony act as defined in Code Section 15-11-2 and committed to the department for detention in any of its institutions under the terms of this chapter, the department shall provide notice to any person who was the victim of the child’s delinquent acts that the child is being released. So long as a good faith attempt to comply with the notice requirement of this subsection has been made, the department and employees of the department shall not be liable for damages incurred by reason of the department’s failure to provide the notice required by this subsection.

After the expiration of one year from the date of commitment, the committing court shall review the case and make such order with respect to the continued confinement or release of the child back to the committing court for further disposition as the court deems proper.

In the event adequate facilities are not available, the department shall have the right to transfer youths committed to the department under this Code section to the Department of Corrections for incarceration in an appropriate facility designated by the Department of Corrections.

Any child under 17 years of age who is sentenced in the superior court and committed to the department may be eligible to participate in all juvenile detention facility programs and services including community work programs, sheltered workshops, special state sponsored programs for evaluation and services under the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, and under the general supervision of juvenile detention facility staff at special planned activities outside of the juvenile detention facility. When such a child sentenced in the superior court is approaching his or her seventeenth birthday, the department shall notify the court that a further disposition of the child is necessary. The department shall provide the court with information concerning the participation and progress of the child in programs described in this subsection. The court shall review the case and determine if the child, upon becoming 17 years of age, should be placed on probation, have his or her sentence reduced, be transferred to the Department of Corrections for the remainder of the original sentence, or be subject to any other determination authorized by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1995, p. 619, § 9; Ga. L. 2000, p. 20, § 27; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-22; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 3/HB 1146; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-9/HB 242.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor” in the first sentence of subsection (e).

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, in subsection (b), in the second sentence, deleted “or parole” preceding “of any child” in the first proviso, in the second proviso, deleted “or paroling” following “upon releasing”, substituted “for committing a delinquent act” for “delinquent”, inserted “class A designated felony act or class B”, substituted “Code Section 15-11-2” for “Code Section 15-11-63”, and deleted “or paroled” following “released” at the end, and, in the last sentence, substituted “So long as” for “As long as” at the beginning; and, in subsection (e), substituted “juvenile detention facility” for “youth development center” three times in the first sentence. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative revocations of juvenile community placement, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Juvenile Justice, Chapter 97-2.

49-4A-10.
Escape from juvenile detention facility; petition; commitment.

Whenever any child shall escape from any juvenile detention facility, the department shall file a petition in the court having jurisdiction and, upon conviction, he or she shall be committed for an additional 12 months in a juvenile detention facility under the jurisdiction of the department or to another institution under the Department of Corrections.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-10/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “juvenile detention facility” for “youth development center” twice. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-4A-11.
Aiding or encouraging child to escape; hindering apprehension of child.

Any person who shall knowingly aid, assist, or encourage any child who has been committed to the department to escape or to attempt to escape its control or custody shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years.

Any person who shall knowingly harbor or shelter any child who has escaped the lawful custody or control of the department shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years.

Any person who shall knowingly hinder the apprehension of any child under the supervision of the Department of Community Supervision or the lawful control or custody of the department who has been placed by the department in one of its institutions or facilities and who has escaped therefrom or who has been placed under supervision and is alleged to have broken the conditions thereof shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1996, p. 988, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 1A/SB 366; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-11/HB 242; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-102/HB 310.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “punished by imprisonment” for “imprisoned” near the end of subsections (a) through (c); and deleted former subsections (d) and (e),which read: “(d) Any person who shall knowingly provide to any child under the lawful control or custody of the department a gun, pistol, or any other weapon, any intoxicating liquor, any controlled substance listed in Code Section 16-13-27 as a Schedule III controlled substance, listed in Code Section 16-13-28 as a Schedule IV controlled substance, or listed in Code Section 16-13-29 as a Schedule V controlled substance, or an immediate precursor of any such controlled substance, or any dangerous drug as defined by Code Section 16-13-71, regardless of the amount, or any other harmful, hazardous, or illegal article or item which may be injurious to department personnel without the consent of the director of the institution providing care and supervision to the child shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years.

“(e) Any child who shall knowingly possess a gun, pistol, or any other weapon, any intoxicating liquor, any controlled substance listed in Code Section 16-13-27 as a Schedule III controlled substance, listed in Code Section 16-13-28 as a Schedule IV controlled substance, or listed in Code Section 16-13-29 as a Schedule V controlled substance, or an immediate precursor of any such controlled substance, or any dangerous drug as defined by Code Section 16-13-71, regardless of the amount, or any other harmful, hazardous, or illegal article or item which may be injurious to department personnel given to said child in violation of subsection (d) of this Code section while under the lawful custody or control of the department shall cause the department to file a delinquency petition in the court having jurisdiction; provided, however, if such person is 17 or older and is under the lawful custody or control of the department, such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years.”
See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, deleted “or youth” following “child” near the beginning of subsections (a) and (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “supervision of the Department of Community Supervision or the” in subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 988, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1996.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1339, § 3/SB 366, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment by this Act shall apply to sentences entered on or after July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 children and youth services legislation, see 13 Ga. U. L. Rev. 314 (1996).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

49-4A-12.
Special school district.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall be a special school district which shall be given the same funding consideration for federal funds that school districts within this state are given.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the schools within the department shall be under the control of the commissioner who shall serve as the superintendent of schools for such district. The Board of Juvenile Justice shall serve as the board of education for such district.

Any school within the department that is operated by a state charter school pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with Code Section 20-2-2084.1 shall be under the control of the State Charter Schools Commission and the governing board of the state charter school, subject to any conditions in the contract. Any such school shall not be considered a part of the special school district established pursuant to this Code section.

The schools shall meet the requirements of the law for public schools and rules and regulations of the State Board of Education. It is the intent of this Code section to fund educational services and programs in this special school district so that youth served therein shall receive the same quality and content of educational services as provided to youth in school districts within this state.

The State School Superintendent may grant waivers for such provisions of the laws and regulations with which the schools cannot comply because of their functioning on an annual basis and in response to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee’s written request and justification. Such exceptions shall be in writing.

Each teacher in the special school district shall receive annual compensation at the rate specified for the type of certificate held by such teacher based on the appropriate teacher salary schedules established pursuant to Code Section 20-2-212.

This provision shall not act to reduce the compensation currently paid any teacher in the special school district.

To the extent such resources are available, federal funding resources shall be utilized to meet increased costs resulting from implementation of this subsection.

The commissioner shall develop and implement a plan whereby there shall be sufficient substitute teachers available for temporary service as needed for each school composing the special school district.

Nothing in the language of this Code section shall be construed as prohibiting any local school district from issuing a diploma to a youth in the custody of the department, upon certification of the principal of a departmental school.

School records of any juvenile in the department’s programs who is issued a diploma by a local school district shall be maintained by such local school district, provided that all references to the juvenile’s commitment to and treatment by the department are expunged.

The special school district under the department shall have the powers, privileges, and authority exercised or capable of exercise by any other school district.

The effect of this Code section shall not be to provide state funds to the special school district under the department through Part 4 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 20-2-2084.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 2-6/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, near the end of subsection (a), substituted “within this state” for “within the state”; designated the existing provisions of subsection (b) as paragraph (b)(1), and, in paragraph (b)(1), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the” for “The” at the beginning of the first sentence; added paragraph (b)(2); substituted “within this state” for “within the state” near the end of the second sentence of paragraph (c)(1); and added “, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 20-2-2084.1” at the end of subsection (h).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Transfer of student records, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, Regional Educational Services, § 160-5-1-.14.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).